Maine, session 132, LD2057.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4832, as amended by PL 2017, c. 234, §27, is further amended
to read:
§4832. Construction loans
The Maine State Housing Authority may participate with financial institutions in the
State in the making of make construction loans for the purpose of land development and
the construction of housing units or housing projects for persons of low income, to support
programs authorized under this chapter and under any terms and conditions that the Maine
State Housing Authority may establish by rule.
1. Participation requirements. Except as provided in paragraphs A and B, the Maine
State Housing Authority may not participate in the making of construction loans unless a
financial institution in the State agrees to participate in the loan at least to the extent of
acting as escrow agent. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, financial institutions
in the State may act as required by this subchapter.
A. The Maine State Housing Authority may make construction loans to state public
bodies or other public instrumentalities and private nonprofit corporations without the
participation of a financial institution.
B. If a project's financing requires that the Maine State Housing Authority participate
in the construction loan at a level greater than 60%, the Maine State Housing Authority
may make the whole construction loan without using an escrow agent.
2. Rules. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish rules in accordance with
the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, Title 5, chapter 375, governing, without
limitation, the following subjects and procedures for participating in the making of
construction loans:
A. The submission, review and acceptance of requests from borrowers for construction
loans under this section;
B. Qualifications of borrowers;
Page 1 - 132LR2896(04)

C. Limitation on and standards for location and construction of housing units or
housing projects;
D. Schedules of fees and other charges made by the authority and the financial
institution to the borrower in accepting, reviewing and acting upon applications for
construction loans under this subchapter; and
E. Restrictions on the interest rates charged by the financial institutions and the
authority on the construction loans or the return on those loans to be realized by the a
financial institution, if the authority participates with a financial institution in making
the construction loan.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4833, as amended by PL 2023, c. 218, §2, is repealed.
Page 2 - 132LR2896(04)